Hawaii statutes.
[§342J-39] Research programs. The
director may initiate, conduct, and support research, demonstration projects,
and investigation, as the department’s resources may allow, and coordinate
state agency research programs pertaining to hazardous waste management. [L
1989, c 212, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next